Wisconsin, session 2025, SB796.
do enact as follows:SB796,11Section 1. 153.01 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB796,2,42153.01 (6) “Machine-readable format” means a digital representation of 3information in a file that can be imported or read into a computer system for further 4processing.SB796,25Section 2. 153.05 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB796,3,36153.05 (1) (c) Subject to s. 153.455 (1) to (3), the data organization under 7contract under sub. (2r) may shall request health care claims information from 8insurers and administrators. The data organization shall analyze and publicly 9report the health care claims information with respect to the cost, quality, and 10effectiveness of health care, in language that is understandable by lay persons, and 11shall develop and maintain a centralized data repository. The data organization 12shall provide to the department, without charge, health care claims information 13collected by and reports produced by the data organization that the department 14requests. If s. 153.455 (4) applies, the department may request health care claims 1information, which may shall be voluntarily provided by insurers and 2administrators, and may perform or contract for the performance of the other duties 3specified for the data organization under this paragraph.SB796,34Section 3. 153.05 (2r) (b) to (f) of the statutes are repealed.SB796,45Section 4. 153.05 (2r) (fm) of the statutes is created to read:SB796,3,96153.05 (2r) (fm) The data organization shall ensure uniform data collection, 7determine a method of collection, and determine the data elements to be collected, 8the reporting formats for data submitted, and, subject to s. 153.47, the use and 9reporting of any data submitted.SB796,510Section 5. 153.05 (3) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB796,3,1611153.05 (3) (c) Upon request of the data organization under contract under sub. 12(2r) for health care claims information, insurers and administrators may shall 13provide the health care claims information to the data organization for use in 14preparing reports and developing and maintaining a central data repository under 15this subchapter, and, if s. 153.455 (4) applies, insurers and administrators may 16shall provide the health care claims information as requested by the department.SB796,617Section 6. 153.05 (5) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB796,4,218153.05 (5) (c) Subject to s. 153.455 (1) to (3), the data organization under 19contract under sub. (2r) may shall request insurers and administrators to submit to 20the data organization health care claims information for the preparation of reports, 21plans, and recommendations in the form specified by the data organization, 22including in standard electronic format. If s. 153.455 (4) applies, the department 23may shall request submission of the health care claims information from insurers 1and administrators in the form specified by the department, including in standard 2electronic format.SB796,73Section 7. 153.05 (5m) of the statutes is created to read:SB796,4,104153.05 (5m) (a) Any insurer or administrator required under this chapter to 5submit health care claims information to the data organization under contract 6under sub. (2r) shall begin submitting the required data in a format specified by the 7data organization under contract under sub. (2r) no later than 6 months from the 8effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date]. After the initial submission, 9the data organization under contract under sub. (2r) shall establish a data 10submission schedule.SB796,4,1211(b) An employer may share claims data with the data organization under 12contract under sub. (2r).SB796,4,1813(c) The state, the Medical Assistance program under subch. IV of ch. 49, and 14any managed care organizations with an agreement to provide services to Medical 15Assistance recipients shall submit data for the database. Any managed care 16organization with an agreement to provide services to Medical Assistance 17recipients that has submitted data to the department is not required to submit the 18data to the database under this paragraph.SB796,4,2119(d) The data organization under contract under sub. (2r) may not modify the 20data submission schedule established under par. (a) or the required format for 21submissions more than one time per year.SB796,822Section 8. 153.05 (8) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB796,5,1123153.05 (8) (c) Subject to s. 153.455 (1) to (3), the data organization under 1contract under sub. (2r) may shall request, analyze, and publicly report, health care 2claims information from insurers and administrators both in a machine-readable 3format and in language that is understandable to laypersons, health care claims 4information, as adjusted for case mix and severity, from insurers and 5administrators. Data from these sources may be obtained through sampling 6techniques in lieu of collection of data on all insureds, and data collection 7procedures shall minimize unnecessary duplication and administrative burdens. If 8s. 153.455 (4) applies, the department may shall request health care claims 9information, which may shall be voluntarily provided by insurers and 10administrators, and may perform or contract for the performance of the other duties 11specified for the data organization under this paragraph.SB796,912Section 9. 153.12 of the statutes is created to read:SB796,5,1613153.12 Advisory committee; all-payer claims database dashboard. 14The secretary of health services may appoint an advisory committee to advise the 15department of health services and the department of employee trust funds on the 16establishment of an all-payer claims database dashboard.SB796,1017Section 10. 153.455 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB796,6,318153.455 (4) If the contract with the data organization is terminated under 19sub. (3) and no organization responds to the request for proposals or a successor 20contract cannot be achieved, the department, in its capacity as a public health 21authority, shall collect health care information, including as specified under s. HFS 22120.14 (1), Wis. Adm. Code, in effect on April 13, 2006, and may shall request health 23care claims information, which may shall be voluntarily provided by insurers or 24administrators, under this subchapter; shall analyze and disseminate, or contract 1for the performance of analysis and dissemination of, the health care information; 2and may analyze and disseminate, or may contract for the performance of analysis 3and dissemination of, the health care claims information.SB796,114Section 11. 153.47 of the statutes is created to read:SB796,6,85153.47 Release of data by data organization. The data organization 6under contract under s. 153.05 (2r) may share data for health care operations, 7public health, research, or publication purposes only if it determines all of the 8following:SB796,6,99(1) That the data request is consistent with program goals.SB796,6,1110(2) That the use of data provides greater transparency in health care costs, 11utilization, quality, or safety.SB796,6,1212(3) That the information will be used to inform policy decisions.SB796,1213Section 12. 153.50 (1) (b) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB796,6,1614153.50 (1) (b) 1. (intro.) “Patient-identifiable data”, for information submitted 15by hospitals and ambulatory surgery centers, means all of the following data 16elements:SB796,1317Section 13. 153.50 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes is repealed.SB796,1418Section 14. 153.50 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB796,6,2019153.50 (2m) Management of data by data organization. (a) The data 20organization under contract under s. 153.05 (2r) shall do all of the following:SB796,6,21211. Ensure the security of the data collected under this subchapter.SB796,6,22222. Protect the privacy of the data in compliance with state and federal law.SB796,7,3233. Incorporate and utilize publicly available data other than administrative 1claims if necessary to measure and analyze a significant health care cost, 2utilization, quality, or safety issue that cannot be adequately measured with 3administrative claims data alone.SB796,7,54(b) The data organization under contract under s. 153.05 (2r) shall, subject to 5the limitations under this subsection, do all of the following:SB796,7,661. Audit the accuracy of all data submitted.SB796,7,872. Share data nationally or help develop a multistate effort if recommended by 8the board of directors of the data organization under contract under s. 153.05 (2r).SB796,7,1193. Share data for health care operations, research, public health, and 10publication purposes if approved by the board of directors of the data organization 11under contract under s. 153.05 (2r).SB796,7,1412(c) The board of directors of the data organization under contract under s. 13153.05 (2r) may make recommendations regarding the database under this 14subchapter that meet any of the following criteria: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb796 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb796 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB796 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB796 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB796: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting